Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5264
Basic health benefit plan; required coverage; applicability.

Except for specified childhood immunizations of children from birth to six years of age, a statute requiring coverage of a health care service or benefit or requiring the reimbursement, utilization, or inclusion of a specific category of licensed health care practitioner shall not apply to a basic health benefit plan delivered or issued for delivery to small employers in this state pursuant to the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 42.